test/src/gt-gloss-yamls/NA_VINIT_aagim_gt-glossing.yaml
     2+aagam+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gdaagmishnaanbaniing
     2+aagam+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gdaagmishnaanbaniig
     2+aagam+NA+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: gdaagmishwaabniin
     2+aagam+NA+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gdaagmishwaabniing
     2+aagam+NA+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gdaagmishwaabniig
     3+aagam+NA+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: daagmishwaabniin
     3+aagam+NA+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: daagmishwaabniing
     3+aagam+NA+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: daagmishniwbaniin
     3+aagam+NA+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: daagmishniwbaniing
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6
     1+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: ndaagmenymishnaanba
     1+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: ndaagmenymishnaandig
     1+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: ndaagmensmishnaanba
     1+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: ndaagmensmishnaandig
     2+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: gdaagmenymishnaanba
     2+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gdaagmenymishnaandig
     2+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt: gdaagmenymishwaaba
     2+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gdaagmenymishwaadig
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: gdaagmensmishnaanba
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gdaagmensmishnaandig
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt: gdaagmensmishwaaba
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gdaagmensmishwaadig
     3+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt: daagmenymishniwba
     3+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt: daagmensmishniwba
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 7
     1+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+4: ndaagmenymishnaanin
     1+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: ndaagmenymishnaaning
     1+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: ndaagmenymishnaanig
     1+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+4: ndaagmensmishnaanin
     1+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: ndaagmensmishnaaning
     1+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: ndaagmensmishnaanig
     2+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+4: gdaagmenymishnaanin
     2+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: gdaagmenymishnaaning
     2+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: gdaagmenymishnaanig
     2+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+4: gdaagmenymishwaan
     2+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: gdaagmenymishwaang
     2+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Pl: gdaagmenymishwaag
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+4: gdaagmensmishnaanin
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: gdaagmensmishnaaning
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: gdaagmensmishnaanig
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+4: gdaagmensmishwaan
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: gdaagmensmishwaang
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Pl: gdaagmensmishwaag
     3+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+4: daagmenymishwaan
     3+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: daagmenymishwaang
     3+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+4: daagmenymishniwan
     3+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Loc: daagmenymishniing
     3+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+4: daagmensmishwaan
     3+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: daagmensmishwaang
     3+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+4: daagmensmishniwan
     3+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Loc: daagmensmishniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 6, 7
     1+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: ndaagmenymishbaniin
     1+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: ndaagmenymishbaniing
     1+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: ndaagmenymishbaniig
     1+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: ndaagmensmishbaniin
     1+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: ndaagmensmishbaniing
     1+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: ndaagmensmishbaniig
     2+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: gdaagmenymishbaniin
     2+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: gdaagmenymishbaniing
     2+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: gdaagmenymishbaniig
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: gdaagmensmishbaniin
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: gdaagmensmishbaniing
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: gdaagmensmishbaniig
     3+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: daagmenymishbaniin
     3+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: daagmenymishbaniing
     3+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: daagmensmishbaniin
     3+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: daagmensmishbaniing
     X+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: daagmenymishbaniin
     X+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: daagmenymishbaniing
     X+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: daagmenymishbaniig
     X+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: daagmensmishbaniin
     X+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: daagmensmishbaniing
     X+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: daagmensmishbaniig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 5, 6, 7
     1+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+4: ndaagmenyminaanbaniin
     1+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: ndaagmenyminaanbaniing
     1+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: ndaagmenyminaanbaniig
     1+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+4: ndaagmensminaanbaniin
     1+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: ndaagmensminaanbaniing
     1+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: ndaagmensminaanbaniig
     2+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+4: gdaagmenyminaanbaniin
     2+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gdaagmenyminaanbaniing
     2+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gdaagmenyminaanbaniig
     2+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+4: gdaagmenymiwaabniin
     2+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gdaagmenymiwaabniing
     2+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gdaagmenymiwaabniig
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+4: gdaagmensminaanbaniin
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gdaagmensminaanbaniing
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gdaagmensminaanbaniig
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+4: gdaagmensmiwaabniin
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gdaagmensmiwaabniing
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gdaagmensmiwaabniig
     3+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+4: daagmenymiwaabniin
     3+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: daagmenymiwaabniing
     3+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+3+4+Prt+4: daagmenyminwibniin
     3+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+3+4+Prt+Loc: daagmenyminwibniing
     3+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+4: daagmensmiwaabniin
     3+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: daagmensmiwaabniing
     3+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+3+4+Prt+4: daagmensminwibniin
     3+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+3+4+Prt+Loc: daagmensminwibniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 5, 6, 7
     1+aagam+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: ndaagmenyshinaanbaniin
     1+aagam+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: ndaagmenyshinaanbaniing
     1+aagam+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: ndaagmenyshinaanbaniig
     1+aagam+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: ndaagmensshinaanbaniin
     1+aagam+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: ndaagmensshinaanbaniing
     1+aagam+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: ndaagmensshinaanbaniig
     2+aagam+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: gdaagmenyshinaanbaniin
     2+aagam+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gdaagmenyshinaanbaniing
     2+aagam+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gdaagmenyshinaanbaniig
     2+aagam+NA+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: gdaagmenyshiwaabniin
     2+aagam+NA+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gdaagmenyshiwaabniing
     2+aagam+NA+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gdaagmenyshiwaabniig
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: gdaagmensshinaanbaniin
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gdaagmensshinaanbaniing
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gdaagmensshinaanbaniig
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: gdaagmensshiwaabniin
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gdaagmensshiwaabniing
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gdaagmensshiwaabniig
     3+aagam+NA+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: daagmenyshiwaabniin
     3+aagam+NA+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: daagmenyshiwaabniing
     3+aagam+NA+Con+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: daagmenyshinwibniin
     3+aagam+NA+Con+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: daagmenyshinwibniing
     3+aagam+NA+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: daagmensshiwaabniin
     3+aagam+NA+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: daagmensshiwaabniing
     3+aagam+NA+Dim+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: daagmensshinwibniin
     3+aagam+NA+Dim+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: daagmensshinwibniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7
     1+aagam+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: ndaagmimshinaanbaniin
     1+aagam+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: ndaagmimshinaanbaniing
     1+aagam+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: ndaagmimshinaanbaniig
     2+aagam+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: gdaagmimshinaanbaniin
     2+aagam+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gdaagmimshinaanbaniing
     2+aagam+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gdaagmimshinaanbaniig
     2+aagam+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: gdaagmimshiwaabniin
     2+aagam+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gdaagmimshiwaabniing
     2+aagam+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gdaagmimshiwaabniig
     3+aagam+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: daagmimshiwaabniin
     3+aagam+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: daagmimshiwaabniing
     3+aagam+NA+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: daagmimshinwibniin
     3+aagam+NA+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: daagmimshinwibniing
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7
     1+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: ndaagmenymishnaanbaniin
     1+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: ndaagmenymishnaanbaniing
     1+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: ndaagmenymishnaanbaniig
     1+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: ndaagmensmishnaanbaniin
     1+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: ndaagmensmishnaanbaniing
     1+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: ndaagmensmishnaanbaniig
     2+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: gdaagmenymishnaanbaniin
     2+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gdaagmenymishnaanbaniing
     2+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gdaagmenymishnaanbaniig
     2+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: gdaagmenymishwaabniin
     2+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gdaagmenymishwaabniing
     2+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gdaagmenymishwaabniig
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: gdaagmensmishnaanbaniin
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gdaagmensmishnaanbaniing
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gdaagmensmishnaanbaniig
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: gdaagmensmishwaabniin
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gdaagmensmishwaabniing
     2+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gdaagmensmishwaabniig
     3+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: daagmenymishwaabniin
     3+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: daagmenymishwaabniing
     3+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: daagmenymishniwbaniin
     3+aagam+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: daagmenymishniwbaniing
     3+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: daagmensmishwaabniin
     3+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: daagmensmishwaabniing
     3+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: daagmensmishniwbaniin
     3+aagam+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: daagmensmishniwbaniing
     
